Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.500

Meeting—Organization.

The convention shall meet at the time and place fixed in the governor's proclamation. The secretary of state shall call it to order, who shall then call the roll of the delegates and preside over the convention until its president is elected. The chief justice of the supreme court shall administer the oath of office to the delegates. As far as practicable, the convention shall proceed under the rules adopted by the last preceding session of the state senate. The convention shall elect a president and a secretary and shall thereafter and thereupon proceed with a publicly recorded voice vote upon the proposition submitted by the Congress of the United States.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1439; 1965 c 9 s 29.74.110. Prior: 1933 c 181 s 7, part; RRS s 5249-7, part. Formerly RCW 29.74.110.]